Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-922
Discrimination; prohibited.

(1) A licensee shall not unfairly discriminate against any consumer or customer because that consumer or customer has opted out from the disclosure of his or her nonpublic personal financial information pursuant to the Privacy of Insurance Consumer Information Act.

(2) A licensee shall not unfairly discriminate against a consumer or customer because that consumer or customer has not granted authorization for the disclosure of his or her nonpublic personal health information pursuant to the act.

Laws 2001, LB 52, § 22.